sl-SI: Material puše krmilne ročice: Delrin/acetal; Hidravlično (polnjeno s tekočino); Brez puš; Poliuretan; Guma; Sferični ležaj (heim/monoball); Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на втулките на носача: Делрин/ацетал; Хидравлични (с флуид); Без втулки; Полиуретан; Гума; Сферичен лагер (heim/monoball); Друг
ja: コントロールアームブッシュの素材: デルリン / アセタール; ハイドロリック (流体封入); ブッシュなし; ポリウレタン; ラバー; 球面軸受 (ハイム / モノボール); その他
fi: Tukivarren puslan materiaali: Delrin/asetaali; Hydraulinen (nestetäytteinen); Ei heloja; Polyuretaani; Kumi; Pallolaakeri (Heim-nivel/monoball); Muu
zh-CN: 控制臂衬套材料: 聚甲醛; 液压（充液）; 无衬套; 聚氨酯; 橡胶; 球面轴承（万向/单球节）; 其他
lt-LT: Valdymo svirties įvorės medžiaga: Delrinas / acetalis; Hidraulinė (užpildyta skysčiu); Be įvorių; Poliuretanas; Guma; Sferinis guolis (Heimo jungtis / „Monoball“); Kita
ko: 컨트롤 암 부싱 재질: 델린/아세탈; 유압식(유체 충전형); 부싱 없음; 폴리우레탄; 고무; 구면 베어링(하임/모노볼); 기타
hr-HR: Materijal čahure upravljačke vilice: Delrin/acetal; Hidraulično (punjeno tekućinom); Bez čahura; Poliuretan; Guma; Sferni ležaj (heim/monoball); Ostalo
cs: Materiál pouzder příčného ramene: Delrin/acetal; Hydraulické (plněné kapalinou); Bez pouzder; Polyuretan; Guma; Kloubové ložisko (Heimův kloub / unibal); Jiné
th: วัสดุของบูชปีกนก: เดลริน/อะซีตัล; ไฮดรอลิก (เติมของเหลว); ไม่มีบุชชิ่ง; โพลิยูรีเทน; ยาง; แบริ่งทรงกลม (Heim/Monoball); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 控制臂襯套材質: Delrin/縮醛樹脂; 液壓 (充液); 無襯套; 聚氨酯; 橡膠; 球面軸承 (魚眼/單球); 其他
nl: Regelarmbus materiaal: Delrin/acetaal; Hydraulisch (gevuld met vloeistof); Geen bussen; Polyurethaan; Rubber; Sferisch lager (heim/monoball); Overig
nb: Materiale for kontrollarmforing: Delrin/acetal; Hydraulisk (væskefylt); Ingen foringer; Polyuretan; Gummi; Sfærisk lager (Heim/Monoball); Annet
es: Material del buje del brazo de control: Delrin/acetal; Hidráulico (lleno de fluido); Sin bujes; Poliuretano; Caucho; Cojinete esférico (heim/monobola); Otro
hu: Lengőkarpersely anyaga: Delrin/acetál; Hidraulikus (folyadékkal töltött); Nincs szilent; Poliuretán; Gumi; Gömbcsuklós csapágy (heim/monoball); Egyéb
it: Materiale della boccola del braccio di controllo: Delrin/acetale; Idraulico (a fluido); Senza boccole; Poliuretano; Gomma; Cuscinetto sferico (heim/monoball); Altro
tr: Salıncak kolu burç malzemesi: Delrin/asetal; Hidrolik (sıvı dolgulu); Burçsuz; Poliüretan; Kauçuk; Küresel yataklı (heim/monoball); Diğer
sv: Material i styrarmsbussning: Delrin/acetal; Hydraulisk (vätskefylld); Inga bussningar; Polyuretan; Gummi; Ledlager (Heim-led/monoball); Annat
sk-SK: Materiál puzdra ovládacieho ramena: Delrin/acetál; Hydraulické (plnené kvapalinou); Bez puzdier; Polyuretán; Guma; Kĺbové ložisko (Heim/monoball); Iné
da: Bøsningsmateriale til styrearm: Delrin/acetal; Hydraulisk (væskefyldt); Ingen bøsninger; Polyurethan; Gummi; Sfærisk leje (heim/monoball); Andet
pt-BR: Material da bucha do braço de controle: Delrin/acetal; Hidráulica (com fluido); Sem buchas; Poliuretano; Borracha; Rolamento esférico (heim/monobola); Outro
vi: Vật liệu bạc lót cần điều khiển: Delrin/acetal; Thủy lực (đổ đầy chất lỏng); Không có ống lót; Polyurethane; Cao su; Vòng bi cầu (heim/monoball); Khác
ru: Материал втулок рычага подвески: Делрин / ацеталь; Гидравлика (жидкостное наполнение); Без сайлентблоков; Полиуретан; Резина; Сферический подшипник (ШС / шарнирный); Другое
de: Material der Querlenkerbuchse: Delrin/Acetal; Hydraulisch (flüssigkeitsgefüllt); Keine Buchsen; Polyurethan; Gummi; Gelenklager (Uniball/Monoball); Sonstige
ro-RO: Materialul bucșei brațului de control: Delrin/acetal; Hidraulic (umplut cu fluid); Fără bucșe; Poliuretan; Cauciuc; Rulment sferic (heim/monoball); Altele
pl: Materiał tulei wahacza: Delrin/acetal; Hydrauliczna (wypełniona płynem); Brak tulei; Poliuretan; Guma; Łożysko sferyczne (heim/monoball); Inny
fr: Matériau des bagues de bras de suspension: Delrin/acétal; Hydraulique (rempli de fluide); Sans silentbloc; Polyuréthane; Caoutchouc; Roulement sphérique (Heim/monoball); Autre
en: Control arm bushing material: Delrin/acetal; Hydraulic (fluid-filled); No bushings; Polyurethane; Rubber; Spherical bearing (heim/monoball); Other
el: Υλικό δακτυλίου βραχίονα ελέγχου: Delrin/Ακετάλη; Υδραυλικό (με υγρό); Χωρίς σινεμπλόκ; Πολυουρεθάνη; Καουτσούκ; Σφαιρικό ρουλεμάν (heim/monoball); Άλλο
pt-PT: Material da bucha do braço de controlo: Delrin/acetal; Hidráulico (com enchimento de fluido); Sem casquilhos; Poliuretano; Borracha; Rolamento esférico (heim/monobola); Outro